Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Chapter 76. Miscellaneous Offenses.

Cross references. —

For increase in classification of misdemeanors committed in connection with a criminal street gang, see AS

12.55.137

. For provisions on insanity and competency to stand trial, see AS 12.47. For provisions relating to punishment, see AS

12.55.135

for imprisonment for misdemeanors, and AS

12.55.035

for fines. For restitution, see AS

12.55.045

.

Sec. 11.76.100.
Selling or giving tobacco to a minor.

A person commits the offense of selling or giving tobacco to a minor if the person

negligently sells a cigarette, a cigar, tobacco, or a product containing tobacco to a person under 19 years of age;

is 19 years of age or older and negligently exchanges or gives a cigarette, a cigar, tobacco, or a product containing tobacco to a person under 19 years of age;

maintains a vending machine that dispenses cigarettes, cigars, tobacco, or products containing tobacco; or

holds a business license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

and allows a person under 19 years of age to sell a cigarette, a cigar, tobacco, or a product containing tobacco.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (a) of this section, a person who maintains a vending machine is not in violation of (a)(3) of this section if the vending machine is located

on premises licensed as a beverage dispensary under AS

04.11.090

, licensed as a club under AS

04.11.110

, or licensed as a package store under AS

04.11.150

; and

as far as practicable from the primary entrance; and

in a place that is directly and continually supervised by a person employed on the licensed premises during the hours the vending machine is accessible to the public; or

in an employee break room or other controlled area of a private work place that is not generally considered a public place and the room or area contains a posted warning sign at least 11 inches by 14 inches indicating that possession of tobacco by a person under 19 years of age is prohibited under AS

11.76.105

.

In this section, a person maintains a vending machine if the person owns the machine or owns or controls a facility in which the machine is located.

The court shall forward a record of each person convicted under this section who holds a business license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

, or who is an employee or agent of a person who holds a license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply to a person who sells or gives tobacco to a minor, if the minor is a prisoner at an adult correctional facility.

A person who violates (a) of this section is guilty of a violation and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $300.

History.

(§ 9 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 125 SLA 1988; am §§ 1, 2 ch 125 SLA 1990; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 113 SLA 1992; am §§ 1—3 ch 135 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. Subsection (f) was formerly (d) and subsections (d) and (e) were formerly (e) and (f), respectively; relettered in 2002.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Under
21 U.S.C. 387f(d)(3)(A)(ii), the minimum age to purchase tobacco products is 21.

Sec. 11.76.100.
Selling or giving tobacco to a minor.

A person commits the offense of selling or giving tobacco to a minor if the person

negligently sells a cigarette, a cigar, tobacco, or a product containing tobacco to a person under 19 years of age;

is 19 years of age or older and negligently exchanges or gives a cigarette, a cigar, tobacco, or a product containing tobacco to a person under 19 years of age;

maintains a vending machine that dispenses cigarettes, cigars, tobacco, or products containing tobacco; or

holds a business license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

and allows a person under 19 years of age to sell a cigarette, a cigar, tobacco, or a product containing tobacco.

Notwithstanding the provisions of (a) of this section, a person who maintains a vending machine is not in violation of (a)(3) of this section if the vending machine is located

on premises licensed as a beverage dispensary under AS

04.09.200

or

04.09.350

, licensed as a club under AS

04.09.220

, or licensed as a package store under AS

04.09.230

and

as far as practicable from the primary entrance; and

in a place that is directly and continually supervised by a person employed on the licensed premises during the hours the vending machine is accessible to the public; or

in an employee break room or other controlled area of a private work place that is not generally considered a public place and the room or area contains a posted warning sign at least 11 inches by 14 inches indicating that possession of tobacco by a person under 19 years of age is prohibited under AS

11.76.105

.

In this section, a person maintains a vending machine if the person owns the machine or owns or controls a facility in which the machine is located.

The court shall forward a record of each person convicted under this section who holds a business license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

, or who is an employee or agent of a person who holds a license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply to a person who sells or gives tobacco to a minor, if the minor is a prisoner at an adult correctional facility.

A person who violates (a) of this section is guilty of a violation and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $300.

History.

(§ 9 ch 166 SLA 1978; am § 2 ch 125 SLA 1988; am §§ 1, 2 ch 125 SLA 1990; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 113 SLA 1992; am §§ 1—3 ch 135 SLA 1998; am § 1 ch 61 SLA 2007; am § 153 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 11.76.105.
Possession of tobacco, electronic smoking products, or products containing nicotine by a minor.

A person under 19 years of age may not knowingly possess a cigarette, a cigar, tobacco, a product containing tobacco, an electronic smoking product, or a product containing nicotine in this state. This subsection does not apply to a person who is a prisoner at an adult correctional facility.

In a prosecution under (a) of this section for possession of an electronic smoking product or a product containing nicotine, it is an affirmative defense that the electronic smoking product or product containing nicotine possessed by the person under 19 years of age was intended or expected to be consumed without being combusted, and the electronic smoking product or product containing nicotine

has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for sale as a tobacco use cessation or harm reduction product or for other medical purposes;

was being marketed and sold for the approved purposes; and

was

prescribed by a health care professional;

given to the person by the person’s parent or guardian;

provided by a state-approved tobacco cessation program administered by the Department of Health and Social Services; or

provided by a pharmacist to a person 18 years of age or older without a prescription.

Possession of tobacco, an electronic smoking product, or a product containing nicotine by a minor is a violation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 125 SLA 1988; am § 3 ch 125 SLA 1990; am §§ 1, 2 ch 57 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative purpose, see sec. 1, ch. 125, SLA 1988 in the Temporary and Special Acts. For punishment of violations, see AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Under sec. 27, ch. 57, SLA 2018, the 2018 amendments to this section “apply to offenses committed on or after” January 1, 2019.

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was enacted as (c); relettered in 2018, at which time former (b) was relettered as (c).

Under
21 U.S.C. 387f(d)(3)(A)(ii), the minimum age to purchase tobacco products is 21.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), inserted “, an electronic smoking product, or a product containing nicotine” following “containing tobacco”; in (b) [now (c)], inserted “, an electronic smoking product, or a product containing nicotine” following “of tobacco”; added (c) [now (b)].

Sec. 11.76.106.
Selling tobacco, electronic smoking products, or products containing nicotine outside controlled access.

Except as provided under (b) of this section, a person may not sell cigarettes, cigars, tobacco, products containing tobacco, electronic smoking products, or products containing nicotine unless the sale occurs in a manner that allows only the sales clerk to control access to the cigarettes, cigars, tobacco, products containing tobacco, electronic smoking products, or products containing nicotine.

Subsection (a) does not apply if the sale

is by vending machine as provided under AS

11.76.100(b)

or

11.76.109(d)

;

is a wholesale transaction, the person is licensed as a manufacturer or distributor under AS

43.50.010

, and the sale occurs on premises where no retail transactions occur;

is by a retailer who sells primarily cigarettes, cigars, tobacco, products containing tobacco, electronic smoking products, or products containing nicotine and who restricts access to the premises to only those individuals who are 19 years of age or older; or

is of electronic smoking products over the Internet to a person 19 years of age or older.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a violation and upon conviction is subject to a fine of not less than $300.

History.

(§ 4 ch 135 SLA 1998; am §§ 3, 4 ch 57 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2020, in paragraph (b)(1), “ AS

11.76.109(d)

” was substituted for “ AS

11.76.109(f)

” to reflect the relettering of that section.

Cross references. —

Under sec. 27, ch. 57, SLA 2018, the 2018 amendments to this section “apply to offenses committed on or after” January 1, 2019.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), twice substituted “products” for “a product” or similar, twice inserted “, electronic smoking products, or products containing nicotine”; in (b), added “or 11.76.109(f)” at the end of (b)(1), in (b)(3), substituted “products” for “or a product” and inserted “, electronic smoking products, or products containing nicotine” following “containing tobacco”, added (b)(4), and made related changes.

Sec. 11.76.107.
Failure to supervise vending machine.

A person commits the offense of failure to supervise a vending machine if the person owns premises licensed as a beverage dispensary under AS

04.11.090

, licensed as a club under AS

04.11.110

, or licensed as a package store under AS

04.11.150

and with criminal negligence fails to have an employee supervise a vending machine on those premises that dispenses cigarettes, cigars, tobacco, products containing tobacco, electronic smoking products, or products containing nicotine as required by AS

11.76.100(b)(1)(B)

and

11.76.109(d)(1)(B)

.

In this section, “supervise” means reasonably monitor the use of.

Failure to supervise a vending machine is a violation and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $300.

History.

(§ 4 ch 113 SLA 1992; am § 5 ch 57 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

Fine authorized for violation - AS

12.55.035(b)(5)

Sentences for violations - AS

12.55.140

Original Code Provision - AS 11.60.080

Under sec. 27, ch. 57, SLA 2018, the 2018 amendments to this section “apply to offenses committed on or after” January 1, 2019.

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (b) was formerly (c) and subsection (c) was formerly (b); relettered in 2002.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), deleted “cigarette” following “supervise a”, inserted “, electronic smoking products, or products containing nicotine” following “containing tobacco” and added “11.76.109(d)(1)(B)” at the end.

Sec. 11.76.107.
Failure to supervise vending machine.

A person commits the offense of failure to supervise a vending machine if the person owns premises licensed as a beverage dispensary under AS

04.09.200

or

04.09.350

, licensed as a club under AS

04.09.220

, or licensed as a package store under AS

04.09.230

and with criminal negligence fails to have an employee supervise a vending machine on those premises that dispenses cigarettes, cigars, tobacco, products containing tobacco, electronic smoking products, or products containing nicotine as required by AS

11.76.100(b)(1)(B)

and

11.76.109(d)(1)(B)

.

In this section, “supervise” means reasonably monitor the use of.

Failure to supervise a vending machine is a violation and upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $300.

History.

(§ 4 ch 113 SLA 1992; am § 5 ch 57 SLA 2018; am § 154 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 11.76.109.
Selling or giving product containing nicotine to a minor.

A person commits the offense of selling or giving an electronic smoking product or a product containing nicotine to a minor if the person

negligently sells an electronic smoking product or a product containing nicotine to a person under 19 years of age;

is 19 years of age or older and negligently exchanges or gives an electronic smoking product or a product containing nicotine to a person under 19 years of age;

maintains a vending machine that dispenses electronic smoking products or products containing nicotine; or

holds a business license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

and allows a person under 19 years of age to sell an electronic smoking product or a product containing nicotine.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply to the sale, exchange, or gift to a person under 19 years of age of an electronic smoking product or a product containing nicotine that is intended or expected to be consumed without being combusted if the electronic smoking product or product containing nicotine

has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for sale as a tobacco use cessation or harm reduction product or for other medical purposes;

is being marketed and sold solely for the approved purposes; and

is

prescribed by a health care professional;

given to a person by the person’s parent or legal guardian;

provided by a state-approved tobacco cessation program administered by the Department of Health and Social Services; or

provided by a pharmacist to a person 18 years of age or older without a prescription.

An employer is legally accountable as provided in AS

11.16.110

for the conduct of an employee who violates (a) of this section if the employer negligently fails to advise the employee regarding the conduct prohibited in (a) of this section.

Notwithstanding (a)(3) of this section, a person who maintains a vending machine is not in violation of (a)(3) of this section if the vending machine is located

on premises licensed as a beverage dispensary under AS

04.11.090

, licensed as a club under AS

04.11.110

, or licensed as a package store under AS

04.11.150

, and is located

as far as practicable from the primary entrance; and

in a place that is directly and continually supervised by a person employed on the licensed premises during the hours the vending machine is accessible to the public; or

in an employee break room or other controlled area of a private work place that is not generally considered a public place and the room or area contains a posted warning sign at least 11 inches by 8.5 inches indicating that possession of electronic smoking products or products containing nicotine by a person under 19 years of age without a prescription is prohibited under AS

11.76.109

.

The court shall forward a record of each person convicted under this section who holds a business license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

, or who is an employee or agent of a person who holds a business license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

, to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

In this section, “product containing nicotine” does not include a cigarette, a cigar, tobacco, or a product containing tobacco.

Selling or giving an electronic smoking product or a product containing nicotine to a minor is a violation and, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not less than $300.

History.

(§ 1 ch 43 SLA 2012; am §§ 6 — 9 ch 57 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsections (d) and (e) were enacted as (f) and (g); relettered in 2018, at which time existing subsections (d) and (e) were relettered as (f) and (g).

Cross references. —

Under sec. 27, ch. 57, SLA 2018, the 2018 changes to this section “apply to offenses committed on or after” January 1, 2019.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, in (a), inserted “an electronic smoking product or” in the introductory language and in (a)(1) and (2); added (a)(3) and (4); in (b), in the introductory language, twice inserted “electronic smoking product or” or similar, and added “containing nicotine” at the end; in (e) [now (g)], inserted “an electronic smoking product or” following “or giving”; added (f) and (g) [now (d) and (e)].

Sec. 11.76.109.
Selling or giving product containing nicotine to a minor.

A person commits the offense of selling or giving an electronic smoking product or a product containing nicotine to a minor if the person

negligently sells an electronic smoking product or a product containing nicotine to a person under 19 years of age;

is 19 years of age or older and negligently exchanges or gives an electronic smoking product or a product containing nicotine to a person under 19 years of age;

maintains a vending machine that dispenses electronic smoking products or products containing nicotine; or

holds a business license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

and allows a person under 19 years of age to sell an electronic smoking product or a product containing nicotine.

The provisions of (a) of this section do not apply to the sale, exchange, or gift to a person under 19 years of age of an electronic smoking product or a product containing nicotine that is intended or expected to be consumed without being combusted if the electronic smoking product or product containing nicotine

has been approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration for sale as a tobacco use cessation or harm reduction product or for other medical purposes;

is being marketed and sold solely for the approved purposes; and

is

prescribed by a health care professional;

given to a person by the person’s parent or legal guardian;

provided by a state-approved tobacco cessation program administered by the Department of Health and Social Services; or

provided by a pharmacist to a person 18 years of age or older without a prescription.

An employer is legally accountable as provided in AS

11.16.110

for the conduct of an employee who violates (a) of this section if the employer negligently fails to advise the employee regarding the conduct prohibited in (a) of this section.

Notwithstanding (a)(3) of this section, a person who maintains a vending machine is not in violation of (a)(3) of this section if the vending machine is located

on premises licensed as a beverage dispensary under AS

04.09.200

or

04.09.350

, licensed as a club under AS

04.09.220

, or licensed as a package store under AS

04.09.230

, and is located

as far as practicable from the primary entrance; and

in a place that is directly and continually supervised by a person employed on the licensed premises during the hours the vending machine is accessible to the public; or

in an employee break room or other controlled area of a private work place that is not generally considered a public place and the room or area contains a posted warning sign at least 11 inches by 8.5 inches indicating that possession of electronic smoking products or products containing nicotine by a person under 19 years of age without a prescription is prohibited under this section.

The court shall forward a record of each person convicted under this section who holds a business license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

, or who is an employee or agent of a person who holds a business license endorsement under AS

43.70.075

, to the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development.

In this section, “product containing nicotine” does not include a cigarette, a cigar, tobacco, or a product containing tobacco.

Selling or giving an electronic smoking product or a product containing nicotine to a minor is a violation and, upon conviction, is punishable by a fine of not less than $300.

History.

(§ 1 ch 43 SLA 2012; am §§ 6 — 9 ch 57 SLA 2018; am § 155 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 11.76.110.
Interference with constitutional rights.

A person commits the crime of interference with constitutional rights if

the person injures, oppresses, threatens, or intimidates another person with intent to deprive that person of a right, privilege, or immunity in fact granted by the constitution or laws of this state;

the person intentionally injures, oppresses, threatens, or intimidates another person because that person has exercised or enjoyed a right, privilege, or immunity in fact granted by the constitution or laws of this state; or

under color of law, ordinance, or regulation of this state or a municipality or other political subdivision of this state, the person intentionally deprives another of a right, privilege, or immunity in fact granted by the constitution or laws of this state.

In a prosecution under this section, whether the injury, oppression, threat, intimidation, or deprivation concerns a right, privilege, or immunity granted by the constitution or laws of this state is a question of law.

Interference with constitutional rights is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 9 ch 166 SLA 1978)

Cross references. —

Definition of “threat” - AS

11.81.900(b)

Official misconduct - AS

11.56.850

Original Code Provision - AS

11.60.340

; AS 11.60.350

TD: V, 120-123

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.76.113.
Misconduct involving confidential information in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of misconduct involving confidential information in the first degree if the person

violates AS

11.76.115

and obtains the confidential information with the intent to

use the confidential information to commit a crime; or

obtain a benefit to which the person is not entitled, to injure another person, or to deprive another person of a benefit; or

publishes or distributes an audio or video recording of an interview of a child for a criminal or child protection investigation, or records of a medical examination of a victim or minor conducted for the purpose of the investigation of an offense under AS

11.41.410

—

11.41.440

,

11.41.450

, or a child protection investigation, including photographs taken during the examination.

Conviction under this section does not limit a person’s ability to obtain civil relief from another person.

The provisions of (a)(2) of this section do not apply to

a person who publishes or distributes a recording, record, or image as permitted or directed under

a court order;

a rule of court; or

a federal or state law requiring the publication or distribution;

the use of a recording, record, or image for training by law enforcement officials, prosecutors, or defense counsel, if the identity of the minor or victim is concealed; or

a recording, record, or image that is released with the consent of

an adult victim or a minor victim for whom the disabilities of minority have been removed for general purposes under AS

09.55.590

; or

a minor’s parent or guardian unless the parent or guardian is the perpetrator of the abuse or offense about which the recording, record, or image was gathered.

Misconduct involving confidential information in the first degree is a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 13 ch 20 SLA 2011; am §§ 1, 2 ch 60 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as subsection (d) and relettered in 2012, at which time subsection (c) was relettered as (d).

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Editor’s notes. —

Under sec. 6(a), ch. 60, SLA 2014, paragraph (a)(2) and subsection (c) of this section apply to offenses committed on or after July 8, 2014.

Sec. 11.76.115.
Misconduct involving confidential information in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of misconduct involving confidential information in the second degree if the person, without legal authority or the consent of another person, knowingly obtains confidential information about the other person.

Conviction under this section does not limit a person’s ability to obtain civil relief from another person.

In this section, “confidential information” includes

information that has been classified confidential by law;

information encoded on an access device, identification card issued under AS

18.65.310

, or driver’s license.

Misconduct involving confidential information in the second degree is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 13 ch 20 SLA 2011)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (c) was enacted as subsection (b), and subsection (b) was enacted as subsection (c).
Relettered in 2011.

Cross references. —

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.76.120.
Opening or publishing contents of sealed letters.

A person who wilfully opens or reads, or has opened and read, a sealed letter not addressed to the person, without authority to do so by the writer or by the person to whom it is addressed, or who wilfully, without the same authority, publishes a letter or portion of it, knowing it to have been opened without the authority of the writer or addressee, upon conviction, is punishable by imprisonment in jail not less than one month nor more than one year, or by a fine of not less than $50 nor more than $500.
This section does not extend to or include an act made punishable by a law of the federal government.

History.

(§ 65-5-115 ACLA 1949)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provision - AS

11.20.660

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

11.20.660

.
Renumbered in 1978.

Sec. 11.76.130.
Interference with rights of physically or mentally challenged person.

A person commits the crime of interference with the rights of a physically or mentally challenged person if the person intentionally prevents or restricts

a physically or mentally challenged person from having full and free pedestrian use of a street, highway, sidewalk, walkway, or other thoroughfare to the same extent that any other person has a right to pedestrian use; or

a physically or mentally challenged person from being accompanied or assisted by a certified service animal, without an extra charge for the service animal, in a common carrier, place of public accommodation, or other place to which the general public is invited except as provided in (b) of this section.

A physically or mentally challenged person who is accompanied or assisted by a certified service animal in a common carrier, place of public accommodation, or other place to which the general public is invited is liable for property damage done by the animal.

In this section,

“certified service animal” means an animal trained to assist a physically or mentally challenged person and certified by a school or training facility for service animals as having completed such training;

“physically or mentally challenged ” means physically or mentally disabled, as defined in AS

18.80.300

.

Interference with the rights of a physically or mentally challenged person is a class B misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 3 ch 69 SLA 1987; am § 2 ch 42 SLA 1988; am § 1 ch 103 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

Original Code Provision - None

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.76.133.
Interference with the training of a service animal.

A person commits the offense of interference with the training of a service animal if the person intentionally prevents or restricts a person who is authorized to train a service animal from being accompanied by an animal that is identified as being in training to be a service animal, or assesses an extra charge because of the animal, in a public facility, except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section.

A trainer who is accompanied by an animal in training to be a service animal in a public facility is liable for property damage done by the animal.

It is an affirmative defense to a prosecution under this section that

the person accompanied by the animal in training to be a service animal did not, when requested by the defendant, give reasonable evidence of being a person authorized to train service animals; or

the defendant prevented entry into the facility or caused the trainer and the animal to leave or be removed from the facility based on unruly or disruptive conduct of the animal that created

a substantial risk of imminent physical injury to a person other than the trainer; or

an atmosphere that made regular activities by other persons in the facility substantially more difficult than usual.

In this section,

“authorized” means employed by, or serving as a volunteer with, a school, agency, or other facility that trains service animals;

“identified as being in training” means wearing a device or exhibiting an insignia approved by a school, agency, or other facility that trains service animals that identifies the animal as being in training to be a service animal;

“in training to be a service animal” means being in the pre-training or training period as required under a program administered through a school, agency, or other training facility for service animals whose goal is to certify the animal as being able to assist physically or mentally challenged persons;

“public facility” means a capital improvement owned, operated, or occupied by, or a mode of transportation owned or operated by, the state, a public corporation of the state, the University of Alaska, a political subdivision of the state, or a regional educational attendance area.

Interference with the training of a service animal is a violation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 103 SLA 1998; am § 18 ch 40 SLA 2008)

Cross references. —

For punishment of violations, see AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.76.140.
Avoidance of ignition interlock device.

A person commits the crime of avoidance of ignition interlock device if the person knowingly

circumvents or tampers with an ignition interlock device in a manner intended to allow a person on probation under AS

12.55.102

, with a condition of sentence under AS

12.55.102

or another section, or who has an ignition interlock limited license to avoid using the device;

rents a motor vehicle to a person and with criminal negligence disregards the fact that the person is on probation under AS 12.55.102, has a condition of sentence under AS 12.55.102 or another section, or has an ignition interlock limited license, unless the vehicle is equipped with an ignition interlock device described in AS 12.55.102; or

loans a motor vehicle to a person and knowingly disregards the fact that the person is on probation under AS 12.55.102, has a condition of sentence under AS 12.55.102 or another section, or has an ignition interlock limited license, unless the vehicle is equipped with an ignition interlock device described in AS 12.55.102.

Avoidance of ignition interlock device

under (a)(1) of this section is a class A misdemeanor;

under (a)(2) or (3) of this section is a class B misdemeanor and is punishable by a term of imprisonment of not more than 30 days and a fine of not more than $500.

History.

(§ 2 ch 57 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 97 SLA 2008; am § 1 ch 85 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

Alcohol related offenses — AS

12.55.102

Definition “ignition interlock device” — AS

12.55.102(e)

Classification of offenses — AS

11.81.250

Original Code Provision — None

For punishment, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment for class A misdemeanors,
and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

Sec. 11.76.150.
Sale of products containing dextromethorphan.

A seller, retailer, or vendor may not sell a product containing dextromethorphan to another person unless

the seller, retailer, or vendor checks a government-issued photo identification and determines the person is 18 years of age or older;

from the person’s outward appearance, the seller, retailer, or vendor would reasonably presume the person to be 25 years of age or older; or

the person is under 18 years of age and has a prescription for the product issued by a licensed practitioner.

A seller, retailer, or vendor or an employee of a seller, retailer, or vendor who knowingly or wilfully violates this section is guilty of a violation and is punishable by a fine of

$150 for the first violation; and

$250 for the second and each subsequent violation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 16 SLA 2016)

Effective dates. —

Although the enactment of this section was to have taken effect May 1, 2016 under § 4, ch. 16, SLA 2016, the governor did not sign the bill until June 2, 2016, and so the actual effective date of this section was June 3, 2016, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.